Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB821.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1021(a) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1021. Regulations.--(a) * * *(3) Within sixty days of the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall take all the necessary actions, including the submission of required documents to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services , to include assisted living services and supplemental health care services as covered medical assistance services in the Community HealthChoices program and to allow licensed assisted living residences to be 123456789101112131415161718 certified as medical assistance providers for these services.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0821PN0849 - 2 - 123